Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 5 Attachment

10-5-1.
“Trustee” defined.

The word “trustee,” wherever occurring in this chapter, shall be deemed to include the words “attorney”, “agent”, “factor”, or “debtor.”

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 596; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-1

.

10-5-2.
Procedure.

A court having jurisdiction over a defendant or his or her assets, including his or her personal estate or real estate, may authorize a plaintiff to attach the defendant’s assets, or any part thereof, after hearing on a motion to attach, notice of which has been given to the defendant as provided in this section. At the time of the commencement of the action, or at any time thereafter, a plaintiff must file a motion in the court having jurisdiction for authority to attach the defendant’s assets, including his or her personal or real estate, and the attachment motion must state the day, time and place of hearing and a copy must be served by the process server on the defendant or by leaving it at his or her last and usual place of abode with some person there at least five (5) days before the fixed date of hearing.

If the defendant does not reside in the state, service of the attachment motion shall be made upon him or her by mailing a copy of the motion to attach, by certified mail, to his or her last known address and, if service is made in this manner, the plaintiff or his or her attorney must attach the sender’s receipt to an affidavit of compliance with this section by the plaintiff or his or her attorney and filing it with the case in the court.

If the plaintiff after diligent search and by affidavit avers that he or she does not know of the defendant’s address, service on the defendant of the motion to attach may after order of the court be made by publication in some public newspaper, once, published in the town, city or county where the defendant’s assets are situated. If there is no public newspaper published in the town, city or county where the defendant’s assets are situated, then in some public newspaper published in the city of Providence. Provided, however, that in all actions where the plaintiff’s claim against the defendant has been reduced to a judgment, the defendant’s assets, including his or her personal estate and real estate, may be attached and may be subject to trustee process as set out in chapter 17 of this title in the same action in which the judgment has been entered.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 510; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 546, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-2

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 50; P.L. 1973, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 357, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-3, 10-5-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 511, 512; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, §§ 15, 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, §§ 15, 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 546, §§ 2, 3; G.L. 1956, §§

10-5-3

, 10-5-4; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 51, effective January 10, 1966.

10-5-5.
Writ of attachment after filing of equitable complaint.

In any civil action of an equitable character, at or after the filing of the complaint, the complainant may move the superior court, ex parte, to issue a writ of attachment, to run against the property of the defendants or any defendant in the cause; and the court, in its discretion, if the cause is of such a nature that an attachment of property is for the proper security of the complainant, shall on the motion, properly supported by affidavits to be filed in the cause, enter an order granting a writ of attachment, which writ may command the attachment of the real and personal estate of the defendant, including his or her personal estate in the hands or possession of any person, co-partnership or corporation, as the trustee of the defendant and his or her stock or shares in any banking association or other incorporated company, like a writ of attachment at the commencement of a civil action in conformity to the specific directions in the court’s order; except as provided in §

6A-7-602

, and shall be served in like manner and be subject to like incidents as a writ of attachment issued at the commencement of a civil action, and for such ad damnum, as shall be directed in the court’s order and stated in the writ. And all property so attached shall be held for the security of any final judgment which the complainant may obtain in his or her favor in the cause, in pursuance of the directions of the order granting the writ of attachment. If a writ of attachment runs against real property and title to the real property is held in the name of a partnership, the writ shall include the name of the partnership.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 523; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 546, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-5

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 50; P.L. 1985, ch. 93, § 3.

10-5-6.
Writ in tort action against nonresident.

At the commencement of a civil action sounding in tort against a nonresident having property within the state, a writ of attachment may be issued from the superior court or any district court wherever the plaintiff in the action, his or her agent or attorney, shall make affidavit, to be endorsed thereon or annexed thereto, that the defendant is a nonresident, and that the plaintiff has a just cause of action against the defendant, upon which the plaintiff expects to recover a sum sufficient to give jurisdiction to the court to which the writ is returnable.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 524; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 546, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-6

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 11.

10-5-7.
Classes of property named in writ.

Whenever a writ of attachment can be issued by any court, it may command the attachment of the goods and chattels of the defendant and his or her real estate and his or her personal estate in the hands or possession of any person, copartnership or corporation, as his or her trustee, except as provided in §

6A-7-602

, and his or her stock or shares in any banking association or other incorporated company, and may be varied so as to command the attachment of one or more of the classes of property of the defendant.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 514; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 548, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-7

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

10-5-8.
Garnishment of wages restricted to amounts not exempt — Child support to have priority.

Any writ of attachment, served as a writ of garnishment for the attachment of the personal estate of the defendant in the hand and possession of any employer of the defendant, shall be effective to attach so much only of such personal estate consisting of the salary or wages due and payable to the defendant, or to become in the future due and payable to the defendant, as is in excess of the amount of the defendant’s salary or wages exempt by law from attachment. And the garnishee, being the defendant’s employer, shall be required to make affidavit and shall be held liable for the defendant’s personal estate consisting of the salary or wages due and payable to the defendant or to become in the future due and payable to the defendant only in respect of the excess amount exempt from attachment. Any writ of garnishment served under the provisions of this section shall state the judgment amount, and the employer shall withhold sums not exempt by law until the amount of withholding equals the amount of the judgment. The employer shall be entitled to the sum of five dollars ($5.00), payable directly from the employee to the employer, for each writ of garnishment served upon the employer regarding any employee.

Subject to any federal or state law to the contrary, any garnishment of wages for child support issued pursuant to §

15-5-25

, and any wage assignment pursuant to §

15-5-24

, or chapter 16 of title 15 shall take priority over any garnishment issued in accordance with this section. This priority shall occur whether or not the garnishment or assignment pursuant to §

15-5-24

or

15-5-25

or chapter 16 of title 15 occurs before or after any garnishment pursuant to this section. In addition, consistent with federal and state law, the state court system may develop a system for the collection of court imposed or assessed fines, costs, fees or other assessments, including restitution, through wage assignment procedures.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 351, § 30, P.L. 1932, ch. 1898, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 548, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-8

; P.L. 1981, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-9.
Method of attaching real estate.

The officer commanded by any writ to attach real estate, or the right, title, and interest of any defendant in real estate, shall attach the real estate by leaving an attested copy of the writ, with a copy of his or her doings thereon, with the town clerk of the town in which the real estate shall be situated, unless there be a recorder of deeds of the town, in which case he or she shall leave the copy with the recorder of deeds; and the town clerk or recorder of deeds, as the case may be, shall note upon the copy the time, as near as may be, when the copy was left with him or her, and shall also enter in a book, to be kept by him or her for that purpose, the names of the parties in the writ, including the name of any partnership set forth in the writ where any real property of a defendant being attached is held in a partnership name the amount of the damages claimed, the time when the copy was left with him or her, and the court to which the writ is returnable, and shall be entitled to demand and receive from the officer a fee of twenty-five cents ($0.25) in each case, and the officer shall in all cases, in accordance with applicable procedural rules, serve the defendant with a copy of the writ and his or her doings thereon.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 534; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-9

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 11; P.L. 1985, ch. 93, § 3.

10-5-10.
Value of goods attached.

Whenever a writ of attachment issued at the commencement of an action, or writ of mesne process, shall command the officer to whom the writ is directed to attach the goods and chattels of a defendant, the officer shall attach the goods and chattels to the value commanded in the writ, if so much can be found by him or her, and may attach any less value, if the plaintiff or his or her attorney shall give order therefor.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 535; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-10

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 50.

10-5-11.
Service of writ on defendant.

The officer making the attachment shall serve the defendant, as provided in applicable procedural rules, with a copy of the writ, having indorsed on the writ a general reference to the class or kind of goods and chattels so attached, together with a statement of the place in which they were found, and of the date and time of day of the attachment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 536; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-11

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 50.

10-5-12.
Custody of attached goods.

The officer shall keep the goods and chattels so attached in his or her custody, as security to satisfy the judgment or decree as the plaintiff may obtain, until by due process of law either he or she shall sell the goods and chattels or they shall be withdrawn from his or her custody.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 537; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-12

.

10-5-13.
Defendant’s bond.

The defendant in any writ upon which goods and chattels shall have been attached may, at any time within forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of Sundays and legal holidays, after the attachment, deliver to the officer a bond in the penal sum of the amount of damages laid in the writ, signed by the defendant or someone in his or her behalf, with surety or sureties to the satisfaction of the officer, with a condition in the surety that the surety shall be null and void if the final judgment or decree in the action or cause in which the writ was served shall be immediately paid and satisfied after the rendition thereof.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 538; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-13

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-14.
Reduction of damages before bond.

If the defendant in the writ shall deem the damages laid in the writ excessive, he or she may, before giving bond under the provisions of this chapter, complain in writing to any justice of the court to which the writ is returnable, requesting their reduction; and the justice may, after due notice to the plaintiff in the writ, or to his or her attorney, and upon cause shown, reduce the damages, and the amount so fixed shall be the penal sum in the bond.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 539; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-14

.

10-5-15.
Filing of bond and delivery of property to defendant.

Upon accepting a bond given to satisfy a judgment or decree as required in this chapter, the officer shall lodge the bond with the clerk of the court to which the writ in the action shall be returnable and shall immediately surrender the goods and chattels attached by him or her to the person whose interest in the goods and chattel shall have been attached, or from whose possession the goods and chattel were taken, by virtue of the writ.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 540; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-15

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-16.
Surrender of attached goods on defendant’s bond.

Every officer having goods and chattels attached by him or her in his or her custody shall surrender the goods and chattel, at any time after the attachment, and before final judgment or decree, to the person whose interest in the goods and chattel has been attached, or from whose possession they have been taken, upon being tendered a bond by the defendant or someone in his or her behalf, with sufficient surety or sureties to the satisfaction of the officer, in double the value of the goods and chattels so attached, the value to be determined by the sworn appraisal of any two (2) or three (3) persons, one chosen by the director of the department of public safety and one by the defendant or his or her attorney, and the third by the creditor or his or her attorney, or in the penal sum of the amount of damages stated in the writ, with condition that the bond shall be null and void if, at any time after final judgment or decree rendered in the action or cause in which the attachment shall have been made, upon request therefor, the appraised value of the goods and chattels shall be paid, or the goods and chattels shall, in as good order and condition as when surrendered, be returned to the officer taking the bond, or to any officer who shall be charged with the service of an execution issued upon the judgment or decree rendered in the action or cause, unless the judgment or decree shall have been paid, or shall be immediately paid, together with the costs upon the execution, upon the making of the request for the return of the goods and chattels or the payment of their appraised value.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 542; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 20; P.L. 1926, ch. 798, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-16

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 23.

10-5-17.
Release of real estate on bond.

The director of the department of public safety or his or her designee wherein any officer commanded by any original writ or writ of mesne process to attach the real estate or right, title, and interest in the real estate of any defendant has attached the real estate or defendant’s right, title, and interest therein, by himself or herself release and discharge the attachment upon the public records at any time after the attachment and before final judgment or decree:

Upon being tendered a bond, running to the division of sheriffs, by the defendant or someone in his or her behalf with sufficient surety, which surety shall be a surety corporation authorized so to act in this state, in the penal sum of the amount of damages stated in the writ, with condition that the bond shall be null and void if there is a settlement or discontinuance of the action or cause, or if the final judgment or decree in the action or cause in which the writ of attachment was served shall be immediately paid and satisfied after the rendition of the final judgment or decree, or if the execution issued in the writ be returned satisfied, or if final judgment or decree in the action or cause is for the defendant, or upon the happening of any event which, ipso facto, would have resulted in the extinguishment of the lien of the attachment had the attachment not been released and discharged pursuant to the provisions of this section; or

Upon payment by a defendant, or by someone in his or her behalf, of the amount of damages stated in the writ, into the registry of the court in which the action or cause is then pending, and the clerk thereof shall immediately notify the sheriff of the fact of the payment and thereafter shall pay from the amount so deposited to the plaintiff, if final judgment or decree is in his or her favor, so much thereof as may be required to satisfy his or her execution, and shall pay the balance, if any, of the amount so deposited, with actual accrued interest, if any, to the defendant, and if judgment or decree in the action or cause is for defendant, in the event upon presentation of execution in his or her favor, the amount so deposited, with actual accrued interest, if any, shall be immediately paid to the defendant, but such amount may at any time be paid by the clerk as the parties may by their agreement stipulate, or as the court upon motion of any party in interest may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 350 § 20; P.L. 1926, ch. 798, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-17

; P.L. 1961, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 23.

10-5-17.1.
Discharge of sheriff’s bond for want of action.

The prejudgment lien against the real estate described in a sheriff’s bond, created by the recording of the sheriff’s bond with the land evidence records of any city or town shall be discharged and dissolved and no longer a lien upon the real estate described in the lien if no action has been taken to enforce the bond for a period of ten (10) years from the date of the recording.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 377, § 1.

10-5-18.
Reduction of damages or partial release of property.

If the defendant in any writ shall deem the damages stated in the writ excessive, or if the property, either real or personal, held under any attachment, shall greatly exceed in value the amount of the damages stated in the writ, the defendant may, at any time before final judgment or decree, complain in writing to any justice of the court to which the writ is returnable, or to the superior court if the writ shall be pending in the superior court upon appeal from a district court, requesting the reduction of the amount of the damages or a release of a portion of the property attached; and the justice or court may, after due notice to the plaintiff in the writ, or to his or her attorney, and upon cause shown, order the damages to be reduced, or a part of the property attached to be released.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 543; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 10; P.L. 1942, ch. 1142, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-18

.

10-5-19.
Attachment of corporate stock or trust estate.

Whenever a writ shall command the attachment of the shares of the defendant in any corporation, or of his or her personal estate in the hands of any person, co-partnership or corporation, as trustee, it shall be served by leaving an attested copy of the writ, having endorsed on the writ the date and time of day of the service, with the person or some member of the co-partnership named in the writ as trustee, or at the usual place of business of the person or co-partnership with some person there employed; or if the trustee, or the corporation whose shares shall be directed to be attached, shall be a bank, with the cashier, treasurer or secretary of the bank; if an insurance company, with the president or secretary of the company; and if any other corporation, it shall be served by leaving an attested copy of the writ, having endorsed on the writ the date and time of day of the service, with the treasurer of the corporation, or the person executing the duties of treasurer of the corporation, or with the attorney of the corporation appointed with authority to accept service of process against the corporation in this state, or with any other officer of the corporation, or with the agent or superintendent of the corporation, or at the office of the corporation with some person there employed, and shall tender to the person upon whom service is made the sum of two dollars ($2.00) and his or her traveling fee as witness in the superior court, and the sum of one dollar ($1.00) and like traveling fee if the writ is returnable in any other court; and the officer shall also serve the defendant in accordance with applicable procedural rules.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 544; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-19

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 11.

10-5-20.
Account rendered by corporate officer.

Subject to the provisions of § 6A-8-317, whenever any banking association or incorporated company shall be served with a copy of a writ attaching its stock or shares, if a bank, its cashier, if an insurance company, its president or secretary, and if any other corporation, its treasurer or the person executing the duties of treasurer, shall render an account upon oath to the court to which the writ shall be returnable, of what stock or shares the defendant had in the company at the time of the serving of the writ, except as provided in §

6A-4-303

. The account shall be filed, in any district court, within ten (10) days after the service of the writ. The account shall be filed, in any other court, within twenty (20) days after the service of the writ.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 575; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 9; P.L. 1930, ch. 1608, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 24; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-20

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 12.

10-5-21.
Filing of officer’s account — Certification.

The disclosure made by virtue of §

10-5-20

shall be sworn to before any person authorized to administer oaths and shall be filed with the clerk of the court to which the writ shall be returnable, and if the name and address of plaintiff’s attorney appears on the writ, a copy of the disclosure shall be mailed to the attorney at that address. The party filing the disclosure shall be entitled, on tendering a copy of the disclosure and a fee of twenty-five cents ($.25) to the clerk, to have the copy certified by the clerk with whom the original is filed, and a certificate indorsed on the copy of the fact and date of filing.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 577; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-21

; P.L. 1968, ch. 62, § 1.

10-5-22.
Defendant’s bond on corporate stock or trust estate.

Whenever a writ shall command the attachment of the shares of the defendant in any corporation, or of his or her personal estate in the hands or possession of any person, co-partnership or corporation, as trustee, the defendant may, at any time after the service of the writ upon the trustee, and before final judgment or decree, deliver to the officer who served the writ a bond, in the penal sum of the amount of damages stated in the writ, signed by the defendant or someone in his or her behalf, with surety or sureties to the satisfaction of the officer, with a condition in the surety that the surety shall be null and void if the final judgment or decree, in the action or cause in which the writ was served, shall be immediately paid and satisfied after the rendition of the final judgment or decree.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 547; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-22

.

10-5-23.
Release of stock or trust estate on acceptance of bond by officer.

Upon the acceptance of the bond as described in §

10-5-22

by the officer, he or she shall immediately deliver to the person, co-partnership or corporation named as trustee in the writ, a certified copy of the writ, with an indorsement on the copy, signed by the officer, setting forth in the indorsement that he or she has accepted the bond and released the shares or personal estate in the hands or possession of the trustee from the attachment; and thereupon the shares or personal estate in the hands or possession of the trustee shall become discharged from the attachment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 548; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-23

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-24.
Release of stock or trust estate by plaintiff.

In case the writ shall have been returned to the court to which it is made returnable, and duly entered in the court, or in case the officer who served the writ shall, from any cause, be unable to accept the bond and release the shares or personal estate in the hands or possession of the trustee from the attachment, then the bond given to release the attachment shall be delivered to the plaintiff, or his or her attorney named on the writ, the bond running to the plaintiff, and with surety to the satisfaction of the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney; and upon the acceptance of the bond by the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney, the plaintiff or his or her attorney shall upon receipt of the bond give to the defendant a certificate, signed by the plaintiff or his or her attorney, that he or she has accepted the bond and released the shares or personal estate from attachment. In the case of the refusal of the plaintiff or his or her attorney to act upon the bond or to receive a proper bond and give such certification, the defendant may petition the court to which the writ is returnable, or if appellate proceedings have been taken may petition the court to which the proceedings have been taken, to accept a bond running to the plaintiff and satisfactory to the court and release the shares or personal estate from attachment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 549; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-24

; P.L. 1961, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, §§ 95, 170.

10-5-25.
Liens and claims on stock preserved.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be so construed as to destroy or impair any lien or claim of any person or body corporate upon any stock or shares attached under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 557; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-25

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-26.
Attachment of mortgaged personal property.

Personal estate, when mortgaged and in the possession of the mortgagor, and while the estate is redeemable at law or in equity, may be attached on writ of attachment against the mortgagor, in the same manner as his or her other personal estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 570; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 549, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-26

.

10-5-27.
Sale of mortgaged property.

When attached, the mortgaged estate may be sold upon the application of the mortgagee or of either of the parties to the suit, in the manner provided for the sale of perishable goods and chattels when attached.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 571; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 549, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-27

.

10-5-28.
Proceeds of sale of mortgaged property.

Upon any sale as provided in §

10-5-27

, the attaching officer shall first apply so much of the proceeds of the sale as may be necessary to pay the amount for which the property was mortgaged, with such deduction for interest for the anticipated payment, or allowance for damages for the anticipated payment, as may be allowed by the justice directing the sale; and the officer shall pay only the balance into the registry of the court for the purposes of the attachment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 572; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 549, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-28

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-29.
Redemption of mortgage by plaintiff in attachment.

The plaintiff in any attachment under §

10-5-26

may redeem the mortgaged estate in the same manner as the mortgagor might have done; and in case of redemption by the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall have the same lien on the property for the amount paid by him or her, with interest, as the mortgagee had.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 573; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 549, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-29

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-30.
Defeat of attachment by failure to sell or redeem from mortgage.

If the mortgage is not redeemed by the plaintiff, or the mortgaged property sold as provided in §

10-5-27

, before the time of redemption expires, the attachment shall become void.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 574; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 549, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-30

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-31.
Defendant in one county and property in another — Summons of defendants from different counties.

If the property attached is in one county and the defendant is, or have his or her usual place of abode, in another county, the attachment may be made by any proper officer of the county where the property is situated, and the defendant may be summoned where he or she may be found or have his or her usual place of abode by the officer making the attachment or by any like officer of the county where the defendant may be found or may have his or her usual place of abode; provided, that the officer making the attachment shall not be required to send a copy of the writ by mail to the address of the defendant in case the summons shall be served as by law provided. If, in any writ, citation, or other process issued from the supreme or superior court, the defendants or respondents named in the writ, citation, or other process reside in different counties, the proper officer making service of the writ, citation or other process in the county where the writ, citation, or other process is returnable may summon the defendants or respondents residing in other counties.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 546; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-31

.

10-5-32.
Surety on defendant’s bond — Lien on surety’s real estate.

Whenever a member of the division of sheriffs shall take a bond for the release of goods and chattels attached on an original writ or a writ of mesne process, in which the ad damnum shall be more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), the bond shall be in the penal sum of the amount of damages stated in the writ, with some surety company authorized to do business in this state as surety, unless the defendant can furnish as surety a resident of the state satisfactory to the officer taking the bond, who is the owner of real estate in this state having a value over all incumbrances thereon, equal to the penal sum of the amount of damages stated in the writ. In case the owner of such real estate is accepted as surety, the bond shall contain a description of the real estate, so that the real estate may be readily identified in the records of land evidence of the city or town in which it is situated, and also a statement by the surety of the value of the real estate free from all incumbrances, and the description and the valuation shall be sworn to by the surety, and his or her affidavit shall be made a part of the bond. Before the goods and chattels are released, an attested copy of the bond shall be filed with the recorder of deeds, but if there is no recorder of deeds, then with a city or town clerk of the city or town in which the real estate is situated, and the copy shall be recorded in the same manner as copies of writs of attachment are recorded under the provisions of this chapter, and the bond shall be a lien upon the real estate described in the bond until the action in which the attachment was made is disposed of, or the bond is cancelled by the plaintiff, or by his or her attorney of record, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction. The officer taking the bond shall be allowed a fee of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for making a copy of the bond, and the fee for the copy, together with the fee for recording, shall be a part of the costs in the case. Any lien created by the provisions of this section may be established, foreclosed, and enforced by a civil action, which action may be heard, tried, and determined according to the usages in chancery and the principles of equity.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 29; P.L. 1927, ch. 1009, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1430, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-32

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 23.

10-5-33.
Inventory included in return of writ.

If the defendant in the writ shall not, within the forty-eight (48) hours as provided in §

10-5-13

, either give a bond as provided in §

10-5-13

or a bond for the value of the goods and chattels attached, in the manner by law provided, the officer shall make an inventory of the goods and chattels by him or her attached upon the writ, and return the inventory as a part of his or her doings in his or her return upon the writ.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 541; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-33

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-34.
Subsequent attachments of other property.

After an attachment of property, subsequent attachments of other property of the defendant may be made by any proper officer, at any time before the defendant is served with the writ; and, if need be, the plaintiff may amend his or her writ for the purpose of having subsequent attachment made.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 550; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-34

.

10-5-35.
Application to sell perishable property or property expensive to keep.

Whenever any officer shall attach, on any writ, any live animals or any goods or chattels which are liable to perish or waste, or to be greatly reduced in value by keeping, or which cannot be kept without great and disproportionate expense, any justice of the court out of which the writ shall have been issued may, on the written application of any person interested in the property, cause the defendant and the attaching creditor, or complainant, their attorneys or agents, to be notified to appear at a time and place appointed for that purpose, to show cause why the animals, goods, or chattels should not be sold.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 568; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 549, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-35

.

Form of Application.

An application under this section need not be sworn to. Morrissey v. Piette,

96 R.I. 151

, 190 A.2d 1,

1963 R.I. LEXIS 63

(1963).

10-5-36.
Sale of perishable property or property expensive to keep.

If, after reasonable notice, no person appears, or no sufficient cause to the contrary is shown, the justice may direct the officer to sell the perishable property in such manner, on such notice, and at such time, as the justice may prescribe; and the officer shall immediately pay the proceeds of the sales, after deducting from the sales the necessary charges of the sales, into the registry of the court, there to be held as security to satisfy the judgment or decree which the attaching creditor or complainant may recover.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 569; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 549, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-36

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 95.

10-5-37, 10-5-38.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 545, 551; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, §§ 23, 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, §§ 23, 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, §§ 12, 18; G.L. 1956, §§

10-5-37

, 10-5-38; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 51, effective January 10, 1966.

10-5-39.
Charges for attested copies restricted to charge for one person.

The officer to whom a writ of attachment shall be directed, commanding the attachment of different kinds of property, shall be entitled to charge for only one attested copy of the writ for any one person with whom the copy is required to be left.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 554; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-39

.

10-5-40.
Attested copies on demand — Fee.

The officer shall give to any defendant, his or her agent or attorney, or any other person interested in any action in which a writ of attachment shall have been served immediately upon his or her request, an attested copy of the writ, with his or her doings thereon, upon being tendered therefor a fee of twenty cents ($.20) for every page of two hundred (200) words of the copy of the writ.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 555; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-40

.

10-5-41.
Time of attachment shown in return.

The officer who shall make any attachment shall, in his or her return, set forth the time of the day when the attachment was made, to the end that the priority of attachment may be known.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 556; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 547, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-41

.

10-5-42.
Appointment of receiver — Effect on attachment.

An attachment of property, on any original writ or writ of mesne process hereafter issued, shall be dissolved by the appointment by the superior court of a permanent receiver to take possession of the property to be attached, if the complaint praying for the appointment of the receiver is filed in the superior court within four (4) months after the attachment was made, unless the court, in its discretion, and on due notice, shall order that the right under the attachment shall be preserved by the receiver for the benefit of the estate in receivership. In such case, the court may authorize the receiver to prosecute the action upon which the attachment was made for the benefit of the estate in receivership and may make all such other orders as may be necessary to enable the receiver to recover for the benefit of the estate in receivership the interest of the defendant in the attached property, as of the time of the attachment, and the right and lien of the creditor under the attachment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 30; P.L. 1932, ch. 1959, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 551, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-5-42

.